Hawaii, session 2026, HB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 387-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "employee" to read as follows: ""Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer, but shall not include any individual employed: (1)  At a guaranteed compensation totaling $4,000 or more a month, whether paid weekly, biweekly, or monthly; (2)  In agriculture for any workweek in which the employer of the individual employs less than twenty employees or in agriculture for any workweek in which the individual is engaged in coffee harvesting; (3)  In or about the home of the individual's employer: (A)  In domestic service on a casual basis; or (B)  Providing companionship services for the aged or infirm; (4)  As a house parent in or about any home or shelter maintained for child welfare purposes by a charitable organization exempt from income tax under section 501 of the federal Internal Revenue Code; (5)  By the individual's sibling, sibling-in-law, child, spouse, parent, or parent-in-law; (6)  In a bona fide executive, administrative, supervisory, or professional capacity or in the capacity of outside salesperson or as an outside collector; (7)  In the propagating, catching, taking, harvesting, cultivating, or farming of any kind of fish, shellfish, crustacean, sponge, seaweed, or other aquatic forms of animal or vegetable life, including the going to and returning from work and the loading and unloading of those products before first processing; (8)  On a ship or vessel and who has a Merchant Mariners Document issued by the United States Coast Guard; (9)  As a driver of a vehicle carrying passengers for hire operated solely on call from a fixed stand; (10)  As a golf caddy; (11)  By a nonprofit school during the time that the individual is a student attending the school; (12)  In any capacity if by reason of the employee's employment, in that capacity and during the term thereof, the minimum wage that may be paid to the employee or maximum hours that the employee may work during any workweek without the payment of overtime, are prescribed by the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, or as the same may be further amended from time to time; provided that if the minimum wage that may be paid to the employee under the Fair Labor Standards Act for any workweek is less than the minimum wage prescribed by section 387-2, then section 387-2 shall apply in respect to the employee for that workweek; provided further that if the maximum workweek established for the employee under the Fair Labor Standards Act for the purposes of overtime compensation is higher than the maximum workweek established under section 387-3, then section 387-3 shall apply in respect to the employee for that workweek; except that the employee's regular rate in that event shall be the employee's regular rate as determined under the Fair Labor Standards Act; (13)  As a seasonal youth camp staff member in a resident situation in a youth camp sponsored by charitable, religious, or nonprofit organizations exempt from income tax under section 501 of the federal Internal Revenue Code or in a youth camp accredited by the American Camping Association; [or] (14)  As an automobile salesperson primarily engaged in the selling of automobiles or trucks if employed by an automobile or truck dealer licensed under chapter 437[.]; or (15)  In agriculture and primarily engaged in the range production of livestock." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________